California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(A) Establish a procedure for applicants to file with the California Film Commission a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the California Film Commission and the Franchise Tax Board for the allocation of the tax credit. The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(i) The budget for the motion picture production.

(ii) The number of production days.

(iii) A financing plan for the production.

(iv) The
 diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant, including, but not limited to, the ethnic and racial makeup of the individuals employed by the applicant during the production of the qualified motion picture, to the extent possible.

(v) All members of a combined reporting group, if known at the time of the application.

(vi) Financial information, if available, including, but not limited to, the most recently produced balance sheets, annual statements of profits and losses, audited or unaudited financial statements, summary budget projections or results, or the functional equivalent of these documents of a partnership or owner of a single member limited liability company that is disregarded pursuant to Section 23038. The information provided pursuant to this clause shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.

(vii) The names of all partners in a partnership not publicly traded or the names of all members of a limited liability company classified as a partnership not publicly traded for California income tax purposes that have a financial interest in the applicant’s qualified motion picture. The information provided pursuant to this clause shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.

(viii) Detailed narratives, for use only by the Legislative Analyst’s Office in conducting a study of the effectiveness of this credit, that describe the extent to which the credit is expected to influence or affect filming and other business location decisions, hiring decisions, salary decisions, and any other financial matters of the applicant.

(ix) Any other information deemed relevant by the California Film Commission or
 the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Establish criteria, consistent with the requirements of this section, for allocating tax credits.

(C) Determine and designate applicants who meet the requirements of this section.

(D) Process and approve, or reject, all applications on a first-come-first-served basis.

(E) Subject to the annual cap established as provided in subdivision (i), allocate an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 17053.85, and allocate any carryover of unallocated credits from prior years.

(2) Certify tax credits allocated to qualified taxpayers.

(A) Establish a verification procedure for the amount
 of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the applicant, including, but not limited to, updates to the information in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(B) Establish audit requirements that must be satisfied before a credit certificate may be issued by the California Film Commission.

(C) (i) Establish a procedure for a qualified taxpayer to report to the California Film Commission, prior to the issuance of a credit certificate, the following information:

(I) If readily available, a list of the states, provinces, or other jurisdictions in which any member of the applicant’s combined reporting group in the same business unit as the qualified taxpayer that, in the preceding calendar year, has produced a qualified motion picture intended for release in the United States
 market. For purposes of this clause, “qualified motion picture” shall not include any episodes of a television series that were complete or in production prior to July 1, 2009.

(II) Whether a qualified motion picture described in subclause (I) was awarded any financial incentive by the state, province, or other jurisdiction that was predicated on the performance of primary principal photography or postproduction in that location.

(ii) The California Film Commission may provide that the report required by this subparagraph be filed in a single report provided on a calendar year basis for those qualified taxpayers that receive multiple credit certificates in a calendar year.

(D) Issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated
 after qualified expenditures have been verified under this section. The amount of credit shown in the credit certificate shall not exceed the amount of credit allocated to that qualified taxpayer pursuant to this section.

(3) Obtain, when possible, the following information from applicants that do not receive an allocation of credit:

(A) Whether the qualified motion picture that was the subject of the application was completed.

(B) If completed, in which state or foreign jurisdiction was the primary principal photography completed.

(C) Whether the applicant received any financial incentives from the state or foreign jurisdiction to make the qualified motion picture in that location.

(4) Provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, upon request, any or all application materials or any other materials received from, or submitted by, the applicants, in electronic format when available, including, but not limited to, information provided pursuant to clauses (i) to (ix), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(5) The information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2.

(h) (1) The California Film Commission shall annually provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Franchise Tax Board, and the board with a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission. The list shall include the names
 and taxpayer identification numbers, including taxpayer identification numbers of each partner or shareholder, as applicable, of the qualified taxpayer.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (5) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall annually post on its Internet Web site and make available for public release the following:

(i) A table which includes all of the following information: a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission, the number of production days in California the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would occur, the number of California jobs that the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would be directly created by the production, and the total amount of qualified expenditures expected to be spent by the production.

(ii) A narrative staff summary describing the production of the qualified taxpayer as well as background information regarding the qualified taxpayer contained in the qualified taxpayer’s application for the credit.

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to make the information submitted by an applicant for a tax credit under this section a public record.

(i) (1) The aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated in any fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 17053.85 shall be an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(A) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in credits for the 2009–10 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, through and including the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(B) The unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year.

(C) The amount of previously allocated credits not certified.

(2) If the amount of credits applied for in any particular fiscal year exceeds the aggregate amount of tax credits authorized to be allocated under this section, such excess shall be treated as having been applied for on the first day of the subsequent fiscal year. However, credits may not be allocated from a fiscal year other than the fiscal year in which the credit was originally applied for or the immediately succeeding fiscal year.

(3) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the California Film Commission shall set aside up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of tax credits each fiscal year for independent films
 allocated in accordance with rules and regulations developed pursuant to subdivision (e).

(4) Any act that reduces the amount that may be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) constitutes a change in state taxes for the purpose of increasing revenues within the meaning of Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and may be passed by not less than two-thirds of all Members elected to each of the two houses of the Legislature.

(j) The California Film Commission shall have the authority to allocate tax credits in accordance with this section and in accordance with any regulations prescribed pursuant to subdivision (e) upon adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 188.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23687.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, an amount equal to 50 percent of the amount contributed by the taxpayer for the taxable year to the College Access Tax Credit Fund, as allocated and certified by the California Educational Facilities Authority.

(b) (1) The aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated and certified pursuant to this section, Section 12207, and Section 17053.87 shall be an amount equal to five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

(2) (A) For the purposes of this section, the California Educational
 Facilities Authority shall do all of the following:

(i) On a first-come-first-served basis, allocate and certify tax credits to taxpayers under this section.

(ii) Establish a procedure for taxpayers to contribute to the College Access Tax Credit Fund and to obtain from the California Educational Facilities Authority a certification for the credit allowed by this section. The procedure shall require the California Educational Facilities Authority to certify the contribution amount eligible for credit within 45 days following receipt of the contribution.

(iii) Provide to the Franchise Tax Board a copy of each credit certificate issued for the calendar year by March 1 of the calendar year immediately following the year in which those certificates are issued.

(B) (i) The California Educational Facilities Authority shall adopt any regulations necessary or appropriate to implement this paragraph.

(ii) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation adopted by the California Educational Facilities Authority pursuant to clause (i).

(c) (1) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding five years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(2) A deduction shall not be allowed under this part for amounts taken into account under this section in calculating the credit allowed by this
 section.

(d) The tax credit allowed by subdivision (a), subdivision (a) of Section 12207, and subdivision (a) of Section 17053.87 for donations to the College Access Tax Credit Fund shall be known as the College Access Tax Credit.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 976, Sec. 4.   (AB 2880)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23688.5.

(a) In the case of a qualified taxpayer who donates qualified donation items to a food bank located in California under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2027, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax,” defined by Section 23036, an amount equal to 15 percent of the qualified value of those qualified donation items.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified donation item” means fresh fruits or fresh vegetables and the following raw agricultural products or processed foods:

(A) All of the following:

(i) “Fruits, nuts, or vegetables” as defined in Section 42510 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(ii) “Meat food product” as defined in Section 18665 of the Food
 and Agricultural Code.

(iii) “Poultry” as defined in Section 18675 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(iv) “Eggs” as defined in Section 75027 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(v) “Fish” as defined in Section 58609 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(B) All of the following food as defined in Section 109935 of the Health and Safety Code:

(i) Rice.

(ii) Beans.

(iii) Fruits, nuts, and vegetables in canned, frozen, dried, dehydrated, and 100 percent juice forms.

(iv) Any cheese, milk, yogurt, butter,
 and dehydrated milk meeting the requirements in Division 15 (commencing with Section 32501) of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(v) Infant formula subject to Section 114094.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(vi) Vegetable oil and olive oil.

(vii) Soup, pasta sauce, and salsa.

(viii) Bread and pasta.

(ix) Canned meats and canned seafood.

(2) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means the person responsible for planting a crop, managing the crop, and harvesting the crop from the land.

(B) (i) “Qualified taxpayer” also means the person
 responsible for growing or raising a qualified donation item, or harvesting, packing, or processing a qualified donation item, provided that person is not a retailer.

(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “retailer” means a person primarily engaged in the business of making retail sales directly to the public.

(3) (A) “Qualified value” shall be calculated by using the weighted average wholesale price based on the qualified taxpayer’s total like grade wholesale sales of the donated item sold within the calendar month of the qualified taxpayer’s donation.

(B) If no wholesale sales of the donated item have occurred in the calendar month of the qualified taxpayer’s donation, the “qualified value” shall be equal to the nearest regional wholesale market price for the calendar month of the donation based
 upon the same grade products as published by the United States Department of Agriculture’s Agricultural Marketing Service or its successor.

(c) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, any deduction otherwise allowed under this part for that amount of the cost paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer that is eligible for the credit shall be reduced by the amount of the credit provided in subdivision (a).

(d) The qualified taxpayer shall provide to the food bank the qualified value of the qualified donation items and information regarding the origin of where the qualified donation items were grown, processed, or both grown and processed. Upon receipt of the qualified donation items, the food bank shall provide a certificate to the qualified taxpayer. The certificate shall contain a statement signed and dated by a person authorized by that food
 bank that the item is donated under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The certificate shall also contain the type and quantity of items donated, the name of the qualified taxpayer or the qualified taxpayers, the name and address of the food bank, and, as provided by the qualified taxpayer, the qualified value of the qualified donation items and their origins. Upon the request of the Franchise Tax Board, the qualified taxpayer shall provide a copy of the certification to the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) The credit allowed by this section may be claimed only on a timely filed original return.

(f) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and for the six succeeding years if necessary, until the credit has been
 exhausted.

(g) This section shall be repealed on December 1, 2027.

(h) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 431 of the Statutes of 2019 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 18.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23689.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on and after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2035, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, an amount as determined by the committee pursuant to paragraph (2) and approved pursuant to Section 18410.2.

(2) The credit under this section shall be allocated by GO-Biz with respect to the 2013–14 fiscal year through and including the 2032–33 fiscal year. The amount of credit allocated to a taxpayer with respect to a fiscal year pursuant to this section shall be as set forth in a written agreement between GO-Biz and the taxpayer and shall be based on the following factors:

(A) The number of jobs the taxpayer will create or retain in this state.

(B) The compensation paid or proposed to be paid by the taxpayer to its employees, including wages and fringe benefits.

(C) The amount of investment in this state by the taxpayer.

(D) The extent of unemployment or poverty in the area according to the United States Census in
 which the taxpayer’s project or business is proposed or located.

(E) The incentives available to the taxpayer in this state, including incentives from the state, local government, and other entities.

(F) The incentives available to the taxpayer in other states.

(G) The duration of the proposed project and the duration the taxpayer commits to remain in this state.

(H) The overall economic impact in this state of the taxpayer’s project or business.

(I) The strategic importance of the taxpayer’s project or business to the state, region, or locality.

(J) The opportunity for future growth and expansion in this state by the
 taxpayer’s business.

(K) The extent to which the anticipated benefit to the state exceeds the projected benefit to the taxpayer from the tax credit.

(L) For a credit allocated beginning with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the training opportunities offered by the taxpayer to its employees.

(3) The written agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (2) shall include:

(A) Terms and conditions that include the taxable year or years for which the credit allocated shall be allowed, a minimum compensation level, and a minimum job retention period.

(B) Provisions indicating whether the credit is to be allocated in full upon approval or in increments based on mutually agreed upon milestones when
 satisfactorily met by the taxpayer.

(C) Provisions that allow the committee to recapture the credit, in whole or in part, if the taxpayer fails to fulfill the terms and conditions of the written agreement.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Committee” means the California Competes Tax Credit Committee established pursuant to Section 18410.2.

(2) “GO-Biz” means the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(c) For purposes of this section, GO-Biz shall do the following:

(1) Give priority to a taxpayer whose project or business is located or proposed to be located in an area of high unemployment or
 poverty.

(2) Negotiate with a taxpayer the terms and conditions of proposed written agreements that provide the credit allowed pursuant to this section to a taxpayer.

(3) Provide the negotiated written agreement to the committee for its approval pursuant to Section 18410.2.

(4) Inform the Franchise Tax Board of the terms and conditions of the written agreement upon approval of the written agreement by the committee.

(5) Inform the Franchise Tax Board of any recapture, in whole or in part, of a previously allocated credit upon approval of the recapture by the committee.

(6) Post on its internet website all of the following:

(A) The name of each taxpayer allocated a credit pursuant to this section.

(B) The estimated amount of the investment by each taxpayer.

(C) The estimated number of jobs created or retained.

(D) The amount of the credit allocated to the taxpayer.

(E) The amount of the credit recaptured from the taxpayer, if applicable.

(F) The primary location where the taxpayer has committed to increasing the net number of jobs or make investments. The primary location shall be listed by city or, in the case of unincorporated areas, by county.

(G) Information that identifies each tax credit award that was given a priority for
 being located in a high unemployment or poverty area, pursuant to paragraph (1).

(7) Consider the extent to which the credit will influence the taxpayer’s ability, willingness, or both, to create jobs in this state that might not otherwise be created in the state by the taxpayer or any other taxpayer. GO-Biz may also consider other factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The financial solvency of the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s ability to finance its proposed expansion.

(B) The taxpayer’s current and prior compliance with federal and state laws.

(C) Current and prior litigation involving the taxpayer.

(D) The reasonableness of the fee arrangement between the taxpayer and
 any third party providing any services related to the credit allowed pursuant to this section.

(E) For allocation periods beginning with the 2023–24 fiscal year, the taxpayer’s willingness to relocate jobs into California from a state that has enacted a law that does any of the following:

(i) Voids or repeals, or has the effect of voiding or repealing, existing state protections against discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(ii) Authorizes or requires discrimination against same-sex couples or their families, or discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(iii) Creates an exemption to antidiscrimination laws in order to permit discrimination against
 same-sex couples or their families, or permits discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(iv) Denies or interferes with, or has the effect of denying or interfering with, a woman’s right to choose to bear a child or to choose and obtain an abortion, as provided by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) For allocation periods beginning with the 2023–24 fiscal year, the taxpayer’s commitment to treating their workforce fairly and creating quality, full-time, wage and salary jobs in the state, evidence of which may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(i) Training, career ladder, apprenticeship, or preapprenticeship programs for nonsupervisorial employees.

(ii) Joint labor-management letter of support.

(iii) A high percentage of full-time wage and salary employees compared to part-time, temporary, and independent contractors.

(iv) Little to no history of a bad safety record, or resolved or pending litigation, violations, citations, fines, or penalties relating to any state or federal environmental and labor laws within the last 10 years.

(G) Any other factors GO-Biz deems necessary to ensure that the administration of the credit allowed pursuant to this section is a model of accountability and transparency and that the effective use of the limited amount of credit available is maximized.

(8) (A) Implementation of
 subparagraphs (E) and (F) of paragraph (7) of this subdivision for the 2022–23 fiscal year is deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare and, therefore, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development is hereby authorized to adopt emergency regulations to implement subparagraphs (E) and (F) of paragraph (7) of this subdivision during the 2022–23 fiscal year in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall require the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development to approve emergency regulations.

(d) For purposes of this section, the Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), review the books and records of all taxpayers allocated a credit pursuant to this section to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions of the written agreement between the taxpayer and GO-Biz.

(B) In the case of a taxpayer that is a “small business,” as defined in Section 23626, review the books and records of the taxpayer allocated a credit pursuant to this section to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions of the written agreement between the taxpayer and GO-Biz when, in the sole discretion of the Franchise Tax Board, a review of those books and records is appropriate or necessary in the best interests of the state.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 19542, notify GO-Biz of a possible breach of the written agreement by a taxpayer and provide
 detailed information regarding the basis for that determination.

(e) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, for a taxable year, the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding five taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(f) Any recapture, in whole or in part, of a credit approved by the committee pursuant to Section 18410.2 shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. Any amount of tax resulting from that recapture shall be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051. The amount of tax resulting from the recapture shall be added to the tax otherwise due by the taxpayer for the taxable year in which the committee’s recapture determination occurred.

(g) (1) The aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated in any fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 17059.2 shall be an amount equal to the sum of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), less the amount specified in subparagraphs (D) and (E):

(A) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for the 2013–14 fiscal year, one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) for the 2014–15 fiscal year, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) for each fiscal year from 2015–16 to 2017–18, inclusive, one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) for each fiscal year from 2018–19 to 2020–21, inclusive, two hundred ninety million dollars ($290,000,000) for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) for each fiscal year from 2022–23 to 2032–33, inclusive.

(B) The unallocated credit amount, if any, from the preceding fiscal year.

(C) The amount of any previously allocated credits that have been recaptured.

(D) The amount estimated by the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Franchise Tax Board and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, to be necessary to limit the aggregation of the estimated amount of exemptions claimed pursuant to Section 6377.1 and of the amounts estimated to be claimed pursuant to this section and Sections 17053.73, 17059.2, and 23626 to no more than seven hundred fifty million dollars ($750,000,000) for either the current fiscal
 year or the next fiscal year.

(i) The Director of Finance shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the estimated annual allocation authorized by this paragraph. Any allocation pursuant to these provisions shall be made no sooner than 30 days after written notification has been provided to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees of each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may determine.

(ii) In no event shall the amount estimated in this subparagraph be less than zero dollars ($0).

(E) (i) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount
 of credit estimated by the Director of Finance to be allowed to all qualified taxpayers for that fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23636.

(ii) If the amount available per fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 17059.2 is less than the aggregate amount of credit estimated by the Director of Finance to be allowed to qualified taxpayers pursuant to subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23636, the aggregate amount allowed pursuant to Section 23636 shall not be reduced and, in addition to the reduction required by clause (i), the aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 17059.2 for the next fiscal year shall be reduced by the amount of that deficit.

(iii) It is the intent of the Legislature that the reductions
 specified in this subparagraph of the aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 17059.2 shall continue if the repeal dates of the credits allowed by this section and Section 17059.2 are removed or extended.

(2) (A) In addition to the other amounts determined pursuant to paragraph (1), the Director of Finance may increase the aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 17059.2 by up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per fiscal year through the 2032–33 fiscal year. The amount of any increase made pursuant to this paragraph, when combined with any increase made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 17059.2, shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per fiscal year through the 2032–33 fiscal year.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Director of Finance increase the aggregate amount under subparagraph (A) in order to mitigate the reduction of the amount available due to the credit allowed to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23636.

(3) Each fiscal year through the 2017–18 fiscal year, 25 percent of the aggregate amount of the credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 17059.2 shall be reserved for “small business,” as defined in Section 17053.73 or 23626.

(4) Each fiscal year, no more than 20 percent of the
 aggregate amount of the credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section shall be allocated to any one taxpayer.

(h) GO-Biz may prescribe rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. Any rule or regulation prescribed pursuant to this section may be by adoption of an emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(i) (1) A written agreement between GO-Biz and a taxpayer with respect to the credit authorized by this section shall not restrict, broaden, or otherwise alter the ability of the taxpayer to assign that credit or any portion thereof in accordance with Section 23663.

(2) A written agreement between GO-Biz and a taxpayer with respect to the credit authorized
 by this section must comply with existing law on the date the agreement is executed.

(j) (1) The Department of Finance shall estimate the total dollar amount of credits that will be claimed under this section with respect to each fiscal year from the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2034–35 fiscal year, inclusive.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall annually provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, by no later than March 1, a report of the total dollar amount of the credits claimed under this section with respect to the relevant fiscal year. The report shall compare the total dollar amount of credits claimed under this section with respect to that fiscal year with the department’s estimate with respect to that same fiscal year. If the total dollar amount of credits claimed for the fiscal year is less than the estimate for that fiscal year, the report shall identify options for increasing annual claims of the credit so as to meet estimated amounts.

(k) (1) Section 19542 shall apply to all information obtained by the Franchise Tax Board and GO-Biz for the purpose of administering the California Competes Tax Credit established under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 19542 and paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board may disclose information to GO-Biz and GO-Biz may disclose information to the Franchise Tax Board for administration of the California Competes Tax Credit established under this section.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 8.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23691.

For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2027, there shall be allowed to a taxpayer that receives a tax credit allocation a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, in an amount determined in accordance with Section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(a) (1) In lieu of the amount of credit computed pursuant to Section 47(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, except as provided in paragraph (2), the amount of credit for the taxable year shall be 20 percent of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures with respect to a certified historic structure.

(2) The applicable percentage shall be 25 percent of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures with respect to a certified historic structure if that certified historic structure meets one of the following criteria:

(A) The structure is located on federal surplus property, if obtained by a local agency under Section 54142 of the Government Code, on surplus state real property, as defined by Section 11011.1 of the Government Code, or on surplus land, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 54221 of the Government Code.

(B) The rehabilitated structure includes affordable housing for lower-income households, as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) The structure is located in a designated census tract, as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 17053.73.

(D) The rehabilitated structure is a part of a military base reuse authority established pursuant to Title 7.86 (commencing with Section 67800) of the Government Code.

(E) The structure is a transit-oriented development that is a higher density, mixed-use development within a walking distance of one-half mile of a transit station.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Certified historic structure” has the same meaning as defined in Section 47(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that is a
 structure in this state and is listed on the California Register of Historical Resources.

(2) “Qualified rehabilitation expenditure” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 47(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that qualified rehabilitation expenditures may include expenditures in connection with the rehabilitation of a building without regard to whether any portion of the building is or is reasonably expected to be tax-exempt use property.

(3) The amendments made by Section 13402(b)(1)(B) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 47(c)(2)(B)(iv) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certified historic structure, shall not apply.

(c) (1) To be eligible for
 the credit allowed by this section, a taxpayer shall request a tax credit allocation from the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, in conjunction with the Office of Historic Preservation.

(2) To obtain a tax credit allocation, the taxpayer shall provide necessary information, as determined by the Office of Historic Preservation and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(3) A tax credit allocation provided to a taxpayer shall not constitute a determination by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee with respect to any of the requirements of this section regarding a taxpayer’s eligibility for the credit authorized by this section.

(4) The Office of Historic Preservation shall establish in regulations
 the time period that a taxpayer who receives a tax credit allocation must commence rehabilitation after the issuance of the tax credit allocation. If rehabilitation is not commenced within the time period established by the office, the tax credit allocation shall be forfeited and the credit amount associated with the tax credit allocation shall be treated as an unused allocation tax credit amount.

(d) A deduction shall not be allowed under this part for any expense for which a credit for that expense is allowed by this section.

(e) If a credit is allowed under this section with respect to any property, the basis of that property shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed.

(f) (1) A
 credit allowed under this section shall be claimed in the first taxable year in which the structure is placed in service.

(2) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and the seven succeeding years, if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(g) For purposes of this section, the Office of Historic Preservation shall do all of the following:

(1) Adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this section. The regulations shall comply with the requirements of the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code).

(2) Establish a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the office and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, for the allocation of the tax credit. The written application shall require the applicant to include a summary of the expected economic benefits of the project. The economic benefits shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of jobs created by the rehabilitation project, both during and after the rehabilitation of the structure.

(B) The expected increase in state and local tax revenues derived from the rehabilitation project, including those from increased wages and property taxes.

(C) Any additional incentives or contributions included in the rehabilitation project from federal, state, or local governments.

(3) Establish a process to determine that applicants meet the requirements of this section and to ensure that the rehabilitation project meets the Secretary of the Interior’s Standards for Rehabilitation, as found in Part 67 of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) Establish a process to approve, or reject, all tax credit allocation applications.

(h) For purposes of this section, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish a process jointly with the Office of Historic Preservation
 to implement the provisions of this section.
